Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1163YH (4) 91 th/ns H.F. 129 Section 1. Section 321A.1, subsection 11, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 11. âProof of financial responsibilityâ means proof of 3 ability to respond in damages for liability, on account of 4 accidents occurring subsequent to the effective date of the 5 proof, arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a 6 motor vehicle, in the amount of twenty fifty thousand dollars 7 because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one 8 accident, and, subject to the limit for one person, the amount 9 of forty one hundred thousand dollars because of bodily injury 10 to or death of two or more persons in any one accident, and the 11 amount of fifteen fifty thousand dollars because of injury to 12 or destruction of property of others in any one accident. 13 Sec. 2. Section 321A.5, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 14 to read as follows: 15 3. A policy or bond is not effective under this section 16 unless issued by an insurance company or surety company 17 authorized to do business in this state, except that if the 18 motor vehicle was not registered in this state, or was a motor 19 vehicle which was registered elsewhere than in this state at 20 the effective date of the policy or bond, or the most recent 21 renewal thereof, the policy or bond is not effective under this 22 section unless the insurance company or surety company if not 23 authorized to do business in this state executes a power of 24 attorney authorizing the department to accept service on its 25 behalf of notice or process in any action upon the policy or 26 bond arising out of the accident. Every such policy or bond 27 is subject, if the accident has resulted in bodily injury or 28 death, to a limit, exclusive of interest and costs, of not less 29 than twenty fifty thousand dollars because of bodily injury 30 to or death of one person in any one accident and, subject to 31 the limit for one person, to a limit of not less than forty 32 one hundred thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or 33 death of two or more persons in any one accident, and, if the 34 accident has resulted in injury to or destruction of property, 35 -1- LSB 1163YH (4) 91 th/ns 1/ 4 H.F. 129 to a limit of not less than fifteen fifty thousand dollars 1 because of injury to or destruction of property of others in 2 any one accident. 3 Sec. 3. Section 321A.15, subsection 1, paragraphs a, b, and 4 c, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 5 a. When twenty fifty thousand dollars has been credited upon 6 any judgment or judgments rendered in excess of that amount 7 because of bodily injury to or death of one person as the 8 result of any one accident. 9 b. When, subject to the limit of twenty fifty thousand 10 dollars because of bodily injury to or death of one person, the 11 sum of forty one hundred thousand dollars has been credited 12 upon any judgment or judgments rendered in excess of that 13 amount because of bodily injury to or death of two or more 14 persons as the result of any one accident. 15 c. When fifteen fifty thousand dollars has been credited 16 upon any judgment or judgments rendered in excess of that 17 amount because of injury to or destruction of property of 18 others as a result of any one accident. 19 Sec. 4. Section 321A.21, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 20 2025, is amended to read as follows: 21 b. Shall insure the person named in the policy and any other 22 person, as insured, using the motor vehicles with the express 23 or implied permission of the named insured, against loss from 24 the liability imposed by law for damages arising out of the 25 ownership, maintenance, or use of the motor vehicles within the 26 United States of America or the Dominion of Canada, subject to 27 limits exclusive of interest and costs, with respect to each 28 such motor vehicle, twenty fifty thousand dollars because of 29 bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident 30 and, subject to said limit for one person, forty one hundred 31 thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of two or 32 more persons in any one accident, and fifteen fifty thousand 33 dollars because of injury to or destruction of property of 34 others in any one accident. 35 -2- LSB 1163YH (4) 91 th/ns 2/ 4 H.F. 129 Sec. 5. Section 321F.1, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. A certificate of an insurance carrier certifying 3 that the lessor under a lease is insured against liability 4 for a judgment in the amount of fifty thousand dollars for 5 personal injury to one individual and in an aggregate amount 6 of one hundred thousand dollars for personal injuries to all 7 individuals involved in a single accident, and in the amount of 8 ten fifty thousand dollars for property damage, resulting from 9 any such single accident in which a motor vehicle under a lease 10 is involved; or 11 Sec. 6. Section 321N.4, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 12 2025, is amended to read as follows: 13 a. While a participating transportation network company 14 driver is logged on to a transportation network companyâs 15 digital network and is available to receive requests for a 16 prearranged ride, but is not engaged in a prearranged ride, 17 primary automobile insurance maintained pursuant to paragraph 18 âcâ shall cover the driver in the amount of at least fifty 19 thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of one 20 person in any one accident, the amount of at least one hundred 21 thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of two 22 or more persons in any one accident, and the amount of at least 23 twenty-five fifty thousand dollars because of injury to or 24 destruction of property of others in any one accident. 25